Hawaii statutes.
[§201N-9] Building or grading permit
required from county. All applicable county-issued permits shall be
required to grade a site or construct a structure for a renewable energy
facility. The applicable county shall establish an expedited process for review
and issuance of all required building or grading permits. Under the process,
the county may contract with a third party to conduct the review of the permit
application and require the applicant for the permit to pay the cost incurred
for the third party review. [L 2008, c 207, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next